Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-407.02
Injuries and illnesses, defined.

Injuries and illnesses means injuries or common illnesses and conditions which are related to, or which limit participation in, exercise, athletic activities, recreational activities, or activities requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina, and for which athletic trainers as a result of their education and training are qualified to provide care and make referrals to the appropriate health care professionals.

Laws 2022, LB436, § 6.